RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/sl_SI.aff
SFX G Y 60
SFX G   am      ati     am
SFX G   am      aš      am
SFX G   am      a       am
SFX G   am      ava     am
SFX G   am      ata     am
SFX G   am      amo     am
SFX G   am      ate     am
SFX G   am      ajo     am
SFX G   am      aj      am
SFX G   am      ajva    am
SFX G   am      ajta    am
SFX G   am      ajmo    am
SFX G   am      ajte    am
SFX G   šim     šati    šim
SFX G   šim     šiš     šim
SFX G   šim     ši      šim
SFX G   šim     šiva    šim
SFX G   šim     šita    šim
SFX G   šim     šimo    šim
SFX G   šim     šite    šim
SFX G   šim     šijo    šim
SFX G   žem     zati    žem
SFX G   žem     žeš     žem
SFX G   žem     že      žem
SFX G   žem     ževa    žem
SFX G   žem     žeta    žem
SFX G   žem     žemo    žem
SFX G   žem     žete    žem
SFX G   žem     žejo    žem
SFX G   žem     ži      žem
SFX G   žem     živa    žem
SFX G   žem     žita    žem
SFX G   žem     žimo    žem
SFX G   žem     žite    žem
SFX G   šem     sati    šem
SFX G   šem     šeš     šem
SFX G   šem     še      šem
SFX G   šem     ševa    šem
SFX G   šem     šeta    šem
SFX G   šem     šemo    šem
SFX G   šem     šete    šem
SFX G   šem     šejo    šem
SFX G   šem     ši      šem
SFX G   šem     šiva    šem
SFX G   šem     šita    šem
SFX G   šem     šimo    šem
SFX G   šem     šite    šem
SFX G   čem     cati    čem
SFX G   čem     češ     čem
SFX G   čem     če      čem
SFX G   čem     čeva    čem
SFX G   čem     četa    čem
SFX G   čem     čemo    čem
SFX G   čem     čete    čem
SFX G   čem     čejo    čem
SFX G   čem     či      čem
SFX G   čem     čiva    čem
SFX G   čem     čita    čem
SFX G   čem     čimo    čem
SFX G   čem     čite    čem

SFX H Y 21
SFX H   im      eti     im
SFX H   im      iš      im
SFX H   im      i       im
SFX H   im      iva     im
SFX H   im      ita     im
SFX H   im      imo     im
SFX H   im      ite     im
SFX H   im      ijo     im
SFX H   em      eti     em
SFX H   em      eš      em
SFX H   em      e       em
SFX H   em      eva     em
SFX H   em      eta     em
SFX H   em      emo     em
SFX H   em      ete     em
SFX H   em      ejo     em
SFX H   em      ej      em
SFX H   em      ejva    em
SFX H   em      ejta    em
SFX H   em      ejmo    em
SFX H   em      ejte    em

SFX F Y 34
SFX F   im      iti     im
SFX F   im      iš      im
SFX F   im      i       im
SFX F   im      iva     im
SFX F   im      ita     im
SFX F   im      imo     im
SFX F   im      ite     im
SFX F   im      ijo     im
SFX F   em      iti     [^j]em
SFX F   em      eš      [^j]em
SFX F   em      e       [^j]em
SFX F   em      eva     [^j]em
SFX F   em      eta     [^j]em
SFX F   em      emo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ete     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ejo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      i       [^j]em
SFX F   em      iva     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ita     [^j]em
SFX F   em      imo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ite     [^j]em
SFX F   jem     ti      jem
SFX F   jem     ješ     jem
SFX F   jem     je      jem
SFX F   jem     jeva    jem
SFX F   jem     jeta    jem
SFX F   jem     jemo    jem
SFX F   jem     jete    jem
SFX F   jem     jejo    jem
SFX F   jem     j       jem
SFX F   jem     jva     jem
SFX F   jem     jta     jem
SFX F   jem     jmo     jem
SFX F   jem     jte     jem

SFX I Y 16
SFX I   čem     či      čem
SFX I   čem     češ     čem
SFX I   čem     če      čem
SFX I   čem     čeva    čem
SFX I   čem     četa    čem
SFX I   čem     čemo    čem
SFX I   čem     čete    čem
SFX I   čem     čejo    čem
SFX I   žem     či      žem
SFX I   žem     žeš     žem
SFX I   žem     že      žem
SFX I   žem     ževa    žem
SFX I   žem     žeta    žem
SFX I   žem     žemo    žem
SFX I   žem     žete    žem
SFX I   žem     žejo    žem

SFX V Y 4
SFX V   0       va      .
SFX V   0       ta      .
SFX V   0       mo      .
SFX V   0       te      .

SFX L Y 5
SFX L   ti      l       ti
SFX L   ti      la      ti
SFX L   ti      li      ti
SFX L   ti      le      ti
SFX L   ti      lo      ti

SFX T Y 1
SFX T   ti      t       ti

SFX U Y 1
SFX U   ti      n       ti

SFX W Y 1
SFX W   ti      je      ti

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   ti      joč     ti

SFX E Y 26
SFX E   im      iš      im
SFX E   im      i       im
SFX E   im      iva     im
SFX E   im      ita     im
SFX E   im      imo     im
SFX E   im      ite     im
SFX E   im      ijo     im
SFX E   eš      0       eš
SFX E   eš      em      eš
SFX E   eš      e       eš
SFX E   eš      eva     eš
SFX E   eš      eta     eš
SFX E   eš      emo     eš
SFX E   eš      ete     eš
SFX E   eš      ejo     eš
SFX E   eš      mo      eš
SFX E   eš      ta      eš
SFX E   eš      te      eš
SFX E   eš      va      eš
SFX E   em      eš      em
SFX E   em      e       em
SFX E   em      eva     em
SFX E   em      eta     em
SFX E   em      emo     em
SFX E   em      ete     em
SFX E   em      ejo     em

SFX A Y 4
SFX A   0       a       .
SFX A   0       e       .
SFX A   0       i       .
SFX A   0       o       .

SFX N Y 65
SFX N   0       na      lj
SFX N   0       nu      lj
SFX N   0       nom     lj
SFX N   0       nov     lj
SFX N   0       noma    lj
SFX N   0       nih     lj
SFX N   0       ni      lj
SFX N   0       ne      lj
SFX N   ro      ra      ro
SFX N   ro      ru      ro
SFX N   ro      rom     ro
SFX N   ro      ri      ro
SFX N   ro      er      ro
SFX N   ro      roma    ro
SFX N   ro      rih     ro
SFX N   o       a       [^r]o
SFX N   o       u       [^r]o
SFX N   o       om      [^r]o
SFX N   o       i       [^r]o
SFX N   o       oma     [^r]o
SFX N   o       ih      [^r]o
SFX N   je      ja      je
SFX N   je      ju      je
SFX N   je      jem     je
SFX N   je      ji      je
SFX N   je      ij      je
SFX N   je      jema    je
SFX N   je      jih     je
SFX N   0       na      [^j]e
SFX N   0       nu      [^j]e
SFX N   0       nom     [^j]e
SFX N   0       ni      [^j]e
SFX N   0       n       [^j]e
SFX N   0       noma    [^j]e
SFX N   0       nih     [^j]e
SFX N   i       a       i
SFX N   i       e       i
SFX N   i       o       i
SFX N   ih      i       ih
SFX N   ih      om      ih
SFX N   ih      ov      ih
SFX N   eš      em      eš
SFX N   eš      e       eš
SFX N   eš      eva     eš
SFX N   eš      eta     eš
SFX N   eš      emo     eš
SFX N   eš      ete     eš
SFX N   eš      ejo     eš
SFX N   eš      mo      eš
SFX N   eš      ta      eš
SFX N   eš      te      eš
SFX N   eš      va      eš
SFX N   an      ne      an
SFX N   an      neva    an
SFX N   an      nevu    an
SFX N   an      nevom   an
SFX N   an      nevoma  an
SFX N   an      nevih   an
SFX N   an      neh     an
SFX N   an      nema    an
SFX N   an      nem     an
SFX N   an      nemi    an
SFX N   an      neve    an
SFX N   an      nevi    an
SFX N   an      ni      an

NOSUGGEST !
